Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-209.02
Excursion or dinner train, defined.

Excursion or dinner train shall mean a train which has all of its passengers board and depart from the same location and is operated for trips of short duration for sightseeing, dining, entertainment, or other recreational purposes.

Laws 1991, LB 427, § 7.